Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6878SV (3) 91 ss/ns S.F. 2433 Section 1. Section 103.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 12A. âNational energy codeâ means the 3 international energy conservation code, 2009 edition, published 4 by the international code council. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 103.1B Energy code ââ amendments ââ 6 limitations. 7 Prior to adopting any changes to the national energy code 8 pursuant to section 103.6, the board shall conduct an analysis 9 of the change in the total cost of the average home built after 10 January 1, 2027, due to any changes to the national energy 11 code. The analysis shall be submitted to the administrative 12 rules coordinator and the administrative code editor for 13 publication in the Iowa administrative bulletin along with the 14 notice of intended action. 15 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 103.1C International energy 16 conservation code ââ notice. 17 The seller of a single-family dwelling constructed on or 18 after January 1, 2027, shall inform the buyer of the dwelling 19 in writing if the dwelling does not comply with the standards 20 of the international energy conservation code, 2024 edition, 21 published by the international code council. 22 Sec. 4. Section 103.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2026, 23 is amended to read as follows: 24 a. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A and in doing so shall 25 be governed by the minimum standards set forth in the most 26 current publication of the national electrical code issued and 27 adopted by the national fire protection association, and 28 amendments to the code, and the national energy code, which 29 code codes and amendments shall be filed in the offices of the 30 state law library and the board and shall be a public record. 31 The board shall adopt rules reflecting updates to the code and 32 amendments to the code. The board shall promulgate and adopt 33 rules establishing wiring standards that protect public safety 34 and health and property and that apply to all electrical wiring 35 -1- LSB 6878SV (3) 91 ss/ns 1/ 2 S.F. 2433 which is installed subject to this chapter . 1 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 2 2027. 3